Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-720
Directors; alternate directors; vacancy; how filled.

Any vacancy occurring in the board or in the position of alternate director, and any directorship to be filled, shall be filled as provided in the bylaws by persons who shall serve until directors or alternate directors may be regularly elected as provided for in section 70-719.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 20, p. 208;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-820;

R.S.1943, § 70-720;

Laws 1974, LB 833, § 2.